Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1731, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 176, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1731), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1731. A. Larceny of merchandise held for sale in
retail or wholesale establishments shall be punishable as follows:
1. For the first or second conviction, in the event the value
of the goods, edible meat, or other corporeal property which has
been taken is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00), the person shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a term
not exceeding thirty (30) days, and by a fine not less than Ten
Req. No. 10030 Page 1

Doll ars ($10.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00);
provided, for the first or second conviction, in the event more than
one item of goods, edible meat, or other corporeal property has been
taken, punishment shall be by imprisonment in the county jail for a
term not to exceed thirty (30) days, and by a fine not less than
Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00);
2. For a third or subsequent conviction, in the event the value
of the goods, edible meat, or other corporeal property which has
been taken is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00), the person shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail
for a term not to exceed one (1) year, and by a fine not exceeding
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00);
3. In the event the value of the goods, edible meat, or other
corporeal property is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) or more but less than Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00), the person shall be guilty of a felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department
of Corrections for a term not to exceed two (2) years, and by a fine
not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00);
4. In the event the value of the goods, edible meat, or other
corporeal property is Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)
or more but less than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), the
person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by
Req. No. 10030 Page 2

impr isonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term not to exceed five (5) years, and by a fine not to exceed One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); or
5. In the event the value of the goods, edible meat, or other
corporeal property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more,
the person shall be guilty of a felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term not to exceed eight (8) years, and by a fine not to exceed One
Thousand Dollars ($ 1,000.00).
B. When three or more separate offenses under this section are
committed within a one-hundred-eighty-day period, the value of the
goods, edible meat, or other corporeal property involved in each
larceny offense may be aggregated to determine the total value for
purposes of determining the appropriate punishment under this
section.
C. In the event any person engages in conduct that is a
violation of this section in concert with at least one other
individual, such person shall be liable for the aggregate value of
all items taken by all individuals. Such person may also be subject
to the penalties set forth in Section 421 of this title, which shall
be in addition to any other penalties provided for by law.
D. Any person convicted pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall also be ordered to pay restitution to the victim as
provided in Section 991f of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
Req. No. 10030 Page 3

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10030 GRS 12/16/24





















Req. No. 10030 Page 4